Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1520
Facilities;
construct, purchase, repair, and equip; revenue bonds; authorized.

Each board may construct, purchase, or otherwise acquire,
remodel, repair, furnish, and equip dormitories, residence halls, single-dwelling
units, multiple-dwelling units, or other facilities for (1) the housing or
boarding of single or married students, faculty, or other employees of the
institution under its control, (2) buildings and structures for student and
faculty unions or centers, and (3) the medical care and other activities of
the students of such institutions, on real estate owned or controlled by such
board or on real estate purchased, leased, or otherwise acquired for such
purpose and pay the cost thereof, including the cost of such real estate,
by issuing revenue bonds payable out
of the revenue from such buildings or facilities, the revenue from the tax levy authorized pursuant to subdivision
(1)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2013-14 and
subdivision (2)(b) of section 85-1517 for fiscal year 2013-14 and each fiscal
year thereafter, or a combination thereof. Any such buildings
or facilities shall be located on or adjacent to a campus or campuses controlled
by such board.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.08;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 42;

Laws 2012, LB946, § 19.